Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB750.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6902YC (3) 91 lh/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 216.12, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. Any bona fide religious institution with respect to 3 any qualifications it may impose based on religion or sexual 4 orientation when the qualifications are related to a bona 5 fide religious purpose, unless the religious institution owns 6 or operates property for a commercial purpose or membership 7 in the religion is restricted on account of race, color, or 8 national origin. This paragraph does not apply to the sale, 9 rental, or occupancy of a dwelling that is a single-family 10 residence, duplex, triplex, or quadruplex located on a 11 subdivided lot within a parcel of land of twenty-five acres or 12 more that is owned by a religious organization, association, or 13 society, or a nonprofit institution or organization operated, 14 supervised, or controlled by or in conjunction with a religious 15 organization, association, or society. 16 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 558C.1 Definitions. 17 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 18 requires: 19 1. âBusiness entityâ means a partnership, corporation, joint 20 venture, limited liability company, trust, or other business 21 organization or business association, however organized. 22 2. âManaging entityâ means a business entity that owns 23 residential property used in a residential arrangement. 24 3. âResidential arrangementâ means an arrangement in which 25 the purchaser of an interest in a business entity is entitled 26 to exclusive possession of residential property owned by the 27 business entity if the purchaser holds the interest in the 28 business entity. 29 4. âResidential propertyâ means real property and 30 improvements for a single-family residence, duplex, triplex, 31 or quadruplex. âResidential propertyâ does not include a unit 32 as defined in section 557A.2. 33 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 558C.2 Disclosure requirements ââ 34 prohibited actions ââ enforcement. 35 -1- LSB 6902YC (3) 91 lh/jh 1/ 5 H.F. _____ 1. An agreement for the purchase of an interest in a 1 managing entity shall disclose to the purchaser that the 2 agreement is for the purchase of an interest in the business 3 entity and not for the purchase of any residential property. 4 2. A purchase agreement, operating agreement, bylaws, 5 rules, or other governing document relating to a residential 6 arrangement or the ownership interest in the managing entity 7 shall not require that a dispute arising from the arrangement 8 or ownership interest be resolved in a forum other than a court 9 established under the laws of this state or the United States. 10 3. A managing entity shall not take any action relating 11 to an interest in the managing entity in a manner that would 12 constitute a violation of chapter 216 if the interest in the 13 managing entity were an interest in real property, including 14 but not limited to any of the following: 15 a. Restricting or prohibiting the transfer of an interest. 16 b. Imposing discriminatory conditions to retain or maintain 17 an interest. 18 c. Refusing to grant an interest to an otherwise qualified 19 person. 20 4. Notwithstanding any provision in an agreement between 21 an owner of an interest and a managing entity, an owner may 22 transfer the interest without approval by the managing entity. 23 5. A managing entity shall not charge a fee or share in 24 the proceeds of the transfer of an interest from an owner to a 25 subsequent purchaser. 26 6. a. A violation of this chapter constitutes an unlawful 27 practice under section 714.16 and chapter 714H. 28 b. A court that finds a violation of this chapter may enjoin 29 a managing entity or a person affiliated with the managing 30 entity from taking any action in furtherance of development of, 31 or construction on, residential property used in a residential 32 arrangement subject to a civil action under this section, 33 including the following: 34 (1) Seeking to become or operating as a public utility as 35 -2- LSB 6902YC (3) 91 lh/jh 2/ 5 H.F. _____ defined in section 476.1. 1 (2) Receiving, directly or indirectly, any public moneys or 2 benefit. 3 Sec. 4. Section 714.16, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 4 by adding the following new paragraph: 5 NEW PARAGRAPH . t. It is an unlawful practice for a person 6 to violate chapter 558C. 7 Sec. 5. Section 714H.3, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 8 by adding the following new paragraph: 9 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0g. Chapter 558C. 10 Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 11 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 12